Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 14 General Provisions

30-14-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 241; G.L. 1956, §

30-14-1

; Repealed by P.L. 1962, ch. 82, § 2. For present law, see §

30-13-122

.

30-14-2.
Federal and state funds.

No funds received from the United States shall be expended under chapters 1 — 14 of this title for any purpose not authorized by federal law or regulations and all other expenditures under those chapters shall be made from funds appropriated by the state.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, and for purposes of this section and §

21-28-5.04

only, the Rhode Island national guard shall be deemed a law enforcement agency eligible to participate in the forfeiture of money and assets seized through federal, state, or municipal counterdrug operations in which members of the guard support said operations; and any money or assets so acquired may be used by the guard in support of its counterdrug program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 242; G.L. 1956, §

30-14-2

; P.L. 2011, ch. 327, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 374, § 2.

30-14-3.
Holding of military commission by civil officer.

Any citizen of this state may hold a commission in the militia of this state, the national guard of the United States, or any active or reserve component of the United States armed forces without thereby vacating any civil office, position, or commission held by that citizen. The holding of any commission shall not constitute such a holding of an office of trust and profit under the government of this state or of the United States as shall be incompatible with the holding of any civil office, position, or commission under the government of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 243; G.L. 1956, §

30-14-3

; P.L. 2004, ch. 414, § 1.

30-14-4.
Reference to laws includes amendments.

Whenever any reference is made to any section of chapters 1 — 14 of this title, or any regulation authorized thereunder, or to any law of this state, or the United States, or the rules and regulations authorized thereunder, that reference shall apply to all amendments and additions thereto now or hereafter made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 244; G.L. 1956, §

30-14-4

.

30-14-5.
Continuation of prior law.

The provisions of chapters 1 — 14 of this title, insofar as they are substantially the same as the statutes existing prior to April 26, 1956, relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as restatements and continuations of those statutes and not as new enactments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 245; G.L. 1956, §

30-14-5

.

30-14-6.
Prior rights and actions.

No action or proceeding commenced before April 26, 1956, and no right accrued, is affected by the provisions of chapters 1 — 14 of this title, but all procedure hereafter taken after April 26, 1956, shall conform to the provisions of those chapters as far as possible.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 246; G.L. 1956, §

30-14-6

.